Arkansas, session 2025, HB1624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-23-102 is amended to read as follows:
16-23-102. County law library boards.
(a)(1) A county law library established pursuant to this chapter shall
be under the control of a county law library board of not less than three (3)
nor more than five (5) persons, who shall be practicing attorneys residing in
the county and who shall be appointed by the county court from attorneys
nominated by the county bar association or, in counties where there is no
county bar association, by a regional bar association which includes that
county.
(2) In any county in which there are fewer than three (3)
practicing attorneys, the board shall be composed of not less than three (3)
nor more than five (5) persons, including the practicing attorney or
attorneys in the county together with one (1) or more additional persons who
are legal residents and qualified electors of the county, appointed by the
county court.
(b)(3) Members of the board under this subsection (a) shall be
appointed for a term of five (5) years, but the initial appointments shall be
*CEB199*
02/27/2025 3:03:34 PM CEB199

HB1624
so arranged that the terms of each member initially appointed expire in
succeeding years.
(4) A vacancy on the board shall be filled in the manner of the
original appointment for the remainder of the term.
(b)(1) In addition to the members of the board appointed under
subsection (a) of this section, the following shall be appointed to the board
by the county court:
(A) One (1) circuit court judge residing in the county or
presiding over a circuit court in the county; and
(B) One (1) district court judge residing in the county or
presiding over a district court in the county.
(2) The appointment of a circuit court judge and district court
judge under subdivision (b)(1) of this section:
(A) Shall be for a term of two (2) years;
(B) Shall begin on the first day of January following a
general election; and
(C) May be for consecutive or nonconsecutive terms.
(3) A vacancy in an appointment of a circuit court judge or
district court judge under subsection (b)(1) of this section shall be filled
in the manner of the original appointment for the remainder of the term.
(c)(1) The board shall have charge of the operation and maintenance of
the county law library and the custody and care of the county law library's
property. The board shall direct the expenditure of funds derived for county
law library purposes under this chapter, and any other funds received by the
county, or the board, for the use of the county law library.
(2) Any excess funds in the county law library book fund not
needed for the operation and maintenance of the county law library may be
expended by the board for any other purpose necessary for improvement in the
administration of justice in the county.
(3)(A) The board may dispose of any personal property of the
county law library it determines is junk, scrap, discarded, or otherwise of
no value to the county law library.
(B) The board may dispose of the personal property under
subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this section by methods that include without
limitation private sale, public sale, gift, or destruction.
(d)(1) The board, subject to approval of the county court, is
02/27/2025 3:03:34 PM CEB199

HB1624
authorized, in implementation of the purposes of this chapter, to enter into
agreements with any person, including other public bodies, in this state
pertaining to the operation and maintenance of a county law library.
(2) Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, agreements
entered into pursuant to the provisions hereof may contain provisions:
(A) Making available to any institution of higher learning
the county law library, and related facilities, and the books, volumes,
treatises, pamphlets, and other educational materials located therein;
(B) Authorizing the institution to maintain, locate, and
relocate in the county law library, select, replace, supervise the use of,
buy, sell, lend, borrow, receive bequests and donations of, and otherwise
deal in and contract concerning, such books, volumes, treatises, pamphlets,
and other educational materials; and
(C) Providing for the operation, maintenance, and
supervision of the county law library and related facilities for the benefit
of the institution, the county, judges and attorneys, and the public.
(3) The agreements may make available to the institution all or
a portion of the collections of the costs levied pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter, for the purpose of performing the obligations of the
institution thereunder.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. IMPLEMENTATION OF ADDITIONAL MEMBERS OF
COUNTY LAW LIBRARY BOARDS. (a) Within thirty (30) days of the effective
date of this act, the county court shall make initial appointments to a
county law library board under § 16-23-102(b).
(b) The initial appointments under subsection (a) of this section
shall expire on the first day of January following the next general election.
(c) Subsequent appointments under § 16-23-102(b) shall be for a term
of two (2) years.







02/27/2025 3:03:34 PM CEB199